New York, session 2025-2026, S1631.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 7 of the cannabis law are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The cannabis control board is hereby created and shall consist of a 4 chairperson nominated by the governor and with the advice and consent of 5 the senate, with one vote, and [four] eight other voting board members 6 as provided for in subdivision two of this section. 7 2. Appointments. In addition to the chairperson, the governor shall 8 have two direct appointments to the board, [and] the temporary president 9 of the senate and the speaker of the assembly shall each have [one] two 10 direct [appointment] appointments to the board, and the minority leader 11 of the senate and the minority leader of the assembly shall each have 12 one direct appointment to the board. Appointments shall be for a term 13 of three years each and should, to the extent possible, be geograph- 14 ically and demographically representative of the state and communities 15 historically affected by the war on drugs. Board members shall be citi- 16 zens and permanent residents of this state. The chairperson and the 17 remaining members of such board shall continue to serve as chairperson 18 and members of the board until the expiration of the respective terms 19 for which they were appointed. Upon the expiration of such respective 20 terms the successors of such chairperson and members shall be appointed 21 to serve for a term of three years each and until their successors have 22 been appointed and qualified. The members, except for the chairperson, 23 shall when performing the work of the board, be compensated at a rate of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04631-01-5 S. 1631 2 1 two hundred sixty dollars per day, and together with an allowance for 2 actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties. 3 The chairperson shall receive an annual salary not to exceed an amount 4 appropriated therefor by the legislature, and their expenses actually 5 and necessarily incurred in the performance of their official duties, 6 unless otherwise provided by the legislature. No member or member's 7 spouse or minor child shall have any interest in an entity regulated by 8 the board. 9 § 2. Section 36 of the cannabis law is amended to read as follows: 10 § 36. Reports of registered organizations. 1. The board shall, by 11 regulation, require each registered organization to file reports by the 12 registered organization during a particular period. The board shall 13 determine the information to be reported and the forms, time, and manner 14 of the reporting. 15 2. The board shall, by regulation, require each registered organiza- 16 tion to adopt and maintain security, tracking, record keeping, record 17 retention and surveillance systems, relating to all medical cannabis at 18 every stage of acquiring, possession, manufacture, sale, delivery, 19 transporting, distributing, or dispensing by the registered organiza- 20 tion, subject to regulations of the board. Such security, tracking, 21 record keeping, record retention and surveillance systems shall be 22 designed to assist state and local governments with the collection of 23 taxes, enforcement of relevant regulations, verification that cannabis 24 products are not unlawfully tampered with or altered prior to legal 25 sale, and prevention of illegal cannabis sales and distribution. 26 § 3. Section 78 of the cannabis law is amended to read as follows: 27 § 78. Record keeping and tracking. 1. The board shall, by regulation, 28 require each licensee pursuant to this article to adopt and maintain 29 security, tracking, record keeping, record retention and surveillance 30 systems, relating to all cannabis at every stage of acquiring, 31 possession, manufacture, sale, delivery, transporting, testing or 32 distributing by the licensee, subject to regulations of the board. 33 2. Every licensee shall keep and maintain upon the licensed premises, 34 adequate books and records of all transactions involving the licensee 35 and sale of its products, which shall include, but is not limited to, 36 all information required by any rules promulgated by the board. Such 37 regulations [may] shall require the utilization of an approved seed-to- 38 sale tracking system compiling a licensee's cannabis inventory and tran- 39 saction data. Such seed-to-sale tracking and reporting shall be 40 designed to assist state and local governments with the collection of 41 taxes, enforcement of relevant regulations, verification that cannabis 42 products are not unlawfully tampered with or altered prior to legal 43 sale, and prevention of illegal cannabis sales and distribution. A 44 licensee shall record in the seed-to-sale tracking system all commercial 45 cannabis activity, including: packaging of cannabis goods, sale of 46 cannabis goods, transportation of cannabis goods to a licensee, receipt 47 of cannabis goods, return of cannabis goods, destruction and disposal of 48 cannabis goods, laboratory testing and results, and any other activity 49 as required by the board. 50 § 4. Section 79 of the cannabis law is amended to read as follows: 51 § 79. Inspections and ongoing requirements. 1. All licensed or 52 permitted premises, regardless of the type of premises, and all records 53 including but not limited to financial statements and corporate docu- 54 ments, shall be subject to inspection by the office, by the duly author- 55 ized representatives of the board, by any peace officer acting pursuant 56 to [his or her] such officer's special duties, or by a police officer. S. 1631 3 1 The board shall make reasonable accommodations so that ordinary business 2 is not interrupted and safety and security procedures are not compro- 3 mised by the inspection. A person who holds a license or permit [must] 4 shall make [himself or herself] themself, or an agent thereof, available 5 and present for any inspection required by the board. Such inspection 6 may include, but is not limited to, ensuring compliance by the licensee 7 or permittee with all of the requirements of this article, the regu- 8 lations promulgated pursuant thereto, and other applicable state and 9 local building codes, fire, health, safety, and other applicable regu- 10 lations. 11 2. All required state and local inspections, including but not limited 12 to, building, plumbing, electrical, fire codes and food safety shall be 13 conducted through the local municipal building department and local 14 county health department. The board shall develop standardized training 15 for such inspections and provide such training to local municipalities 16 and local county health departments at no cost. 17 3. The applicant shall allow reasonable access to the department 18 and/or its authorized representatives for the purpose of conducting an 19 on-site survey or inspection of such applicant's proposed manufacturing 20 and/or dispensing facilities. Any costs associated with such inspections 21 shall be reimbursed to such municipalities by the office of cannabis 22 management. 23 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.